California statutes. Public Resources Code
For the purposes of this chapter, “California desert” means the California Desert Conservation Area as described in Section 1781 of Title 43 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8722.

(a) The commission shall enter into a memorandum of agreement by April 1, 2012, with the United States Secretary of the Interior to facilitate land exchanges that consolidate school land parcels into contiguous holdings that are suitable for large-scale renewable energy-related projects. The memorandum of agreement shall be tailored, to the extent feasible, to prioritize land exchanges that are best suited for large-scale renewable energy project development, including for the purposes of mitigation of the impacts of that development.

(b) After the memorandum of agreement is entered into, the commission shall make best efforts to consolidate all school land parcels in the California desert into
 contiguous holdings for large-scale renewable energy-related projects.

(c) The commission shall report to the Legislature by January 1 of each year on the status of the memorandum of agreement and school land consolidation efforts in the California desert.

(d) The requirements of this section are contingent on the cooperation of the United States Secretary of the Interior.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8723.

(a) Within 240 days of the execution of a memorandum of agreement pursuant to Section 8722, the commission shall prepare and submit to the United States Secretary of the Interior a proposal for land exchanges that consolidate school land parcels in the California desert into contiguous holdings that are suitable for large-scale renewable energy-related projects. In developing the proposal, the commission shall give priority to land exchanges that will facilitate the development of large-scale renewable energy projects.

(b) The commission’s proposal shall be based on an acre-for-acre exchange with the United States.
 If the United States is not authorized to enter into such an agreement, the commission may propose an exchange based on equivalent appraised values.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the commission may withhold a school land parcel from an exchange proposal or request additional consideration from the United States Secretary of the Interior if the commission reasonably believes, based on existing and reliable information, that an acre-for-acre exchange would not provide the state with compensation that is equal to or greater than the fair market value of the school land parcel. For the purposes of this subdivision, the commission shall consider the potential renewable energy value of a parcel the commission would receive in the exchange.

(d) In preparing the land exchange proposal, the commission shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game to
 identify areas in the California desert that would be consistent with the proposed or adopted provisions of the Desert Renewable Energy Conservation Plan and are either of the following:

(1) Suitable for renewable energy projects because the identified areas do not support habitat or habitat corridor values for species listed as threatened, endangered, or candidate species pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), that, in the judgment of the Department of Fish and Game, are sufficient to warrant consideration of their designation as a mitigation or conservation area for these species.

(2) Suitable as potential mitigation areas to mitigate the impacts that renewable energy-related projects may have on the
 environment.

(e) The commission’s costs and expenses attributable to the land exchange process may be payable from the fund. Notwithstanding Section 6217.5, a portion of the revenues generated from renewable energy leases pursuant to this chapter shall be made available to the commission, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to cover the commission’s costs attributable to the land exchange process.

(f) The commission may consider counter land exchange proposals from the United States Secretary of the Interior and make additional proposals to the extent that the additional proposals achieve the goals set forth in this chapter.

(g) Final approval of a land exchange proposed pursuant to this chapter shall be
 made by the commission at a properly noticed commission meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7.8. OIL SPILL PREVENTION AND RESPONSE [8750. - 8760.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [8750. - 8751.]

8750.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions govern the construction of this division:

(a) “Administrator” means the administrator for oil spill response appointed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8670.4 of the Government Code.

(b) “Barges” means any vessel that carries oil in commercial quantities as cargo but is not equipped with a means of self-propulsion.

(c) (1) “Best achievable protection” means the highest level of protection which can be achieved through both the use of the best achievable technology and those manpower levels,
 training procedures, and operational methods which provide the greatest degree of protection achievable. The administrator’s determination of best achievable protection shall be guided by the critical need to protect valuable coastal resources and marine waters, while also considering (A) the protection provided by the measures, (B) the technological achievability of the measures, and (C) the cost of the measures.

(2) It is not the intent of the Legislature that the administrator use a cost-benefit or cost-effectiveness analysis or any particular method of analysis in determining which measures to require. Instead, it is the intent of the Legislature that the administrator give reasonable consideration to the protection provided by the measures, the technological achievability of the measures, and the cost of the measures when establishing
 the requirements to provide the best achievable protection for coastal and marine resources.

(d) “Best achievable technology” means that technology that provides the greatest degree of protection taking into consideration (1) processes that are being developed, or could feasibly be developed anywhere in the world, given overall reasonable expenditures on research and development, and (2) processes that are currently in use anywhere in the world. In determining what is best achievable technology, the administrator shall consider the effectiveness and engineering feasibility of the technology.

(e) “Commission” means the State Lands Commission.

(f) “Local government” means any chartered or general law city, chartered or
 general law county or any city and county.

(g) “Marine facility” means any facility of any kind, other than a vessel, that is or was used for the purposes of exploring for, drilling for, producing, storing, handling, transferring, processing, refining, or transporting oil and is located in marine waters, or is located where a discharge could impact marine waters unless the facility (1) is subject to Chapter 6.67 (commencing with Section 25270) or Chapter 6.75 (commencing with Section 25299.10) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code or (2) is placed on a farm, nursery, logging site, or construction site and does not exceed 20,000 gallons in a single storage tank. For the purposes of this division, a drill ship, semisubmersible drilling platform, jack-up type drilling rig, or any other floating or temporary drilling platform is a
 “marine facility.” For the purposes of this division, a small craft refueling dock is not a “marine facility.”

(h) “Marine terminal” means any marine facility used for transferring oil to or from tankers or barges. For the purposes of this section, a marine terminal includes all piping not integrally connected to a tank facility as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 25270.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) “Marine waters” means those waters subject to tidal influence, except for waters in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Rivers and Delta upstream from a line running north and south through the point where Contra Costa, Sacramento, and Solano Counties meet.

(j) “Nonpersistent oil” means a petroleum-based oil, such as gasoline,
 diesel, or jet fuel, that evaporates relatively quickly. Specifically, it is an oil with hydrocarbon fractions, at least 50 percent of which, by volume, distills at a temperature of 645 degrees Fahrenheit, and at least 95 percent of which, by volume, distills at a temperature of 700 degrees Fahrenheit.

(k) “Oil” has the same meaning as in subdivision (p) of Section 8670.3 of the Government Code.

(l) “Onshore facility” means any facility of any kind which is located entirely on lands not covered by marine waters.

(m) “Operator” when used in connection with vessels, marine terminals, pipelines, or facilities, means any person or entity that owns, has an ownership interest in, charters, leases, rents, operates,
 participates in the operation of or uses that vessel, terminal, pipeline, or facility. “Operator” does not include any entity that owns the land underlying the facility or the facility itself, where the entity is not involved in the operations of the facility.

(n) “Person” means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, or corporation, including, but not limited to, a government corporation, partnership, limited liability company, and association. “Person” also includes any city, county, city and county, district, and the state or any department or agency thereof, and the federal government, or any department or agency thereof, to the extent permitted by law.

(o) “Pipeline” means any pipeline used at any time to transport oil.

(p) “Responsible party” or “party responsible” means either of the following:

(1) The owner or transporter of oil or a person or entity accepting responsibility for the oil.

(2) The owner, operator, or lessee of, or person who charters by demise, any vessel or marine facility or a person or entity accepting responsibility for the vessel or marine facility.

(q) “Small craft refueling dock” means a fixed facility having tank storage capacity not exceeding 20,000 gallons in any single storage tank and that dispenses nonpersistent oil to small craft.

(r) “Spill” or “discharge” means any release of at least one
 barrel (42 gallons) of oil not authorized by any federal, state, or local government entity.

(s) “State oil spill contingency plan” means the California oil spill contingency plan prepared pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 8574.1) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(t) “Tanker” means any self-propelled, waterborne vessel, constructed or adapted for the carriage of oil in bulk or in commercial quantities as cargo.

(u) “Vessel” means a tanker or barge as defined in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 65.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8751.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this division shall be applicable to all terminals, pipelines, facilities, vessels, and activities in the state, whether on lands that have been legislatively granted to local governments or on lands which remain ungranted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1248, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Prevention, Inspection, Response, Containment, and Cleanup Programs [8752. - 8760.]

8752.

No tanker or barge may use any marine facility in the state unless the tanker or barge is in compliance with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations governing equipment, personnel, construction, financial responsibility, and operations relating to the prevention of oil spills.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1248, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

8753.

All rules, regulations, and guidelines required pursuant to this chapter shall be adopted by January 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1248, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

8754.

(a) The administrator may prohibit an owner or operator of a marine terminal from delivering or accepting oil to or from any tanker or barge if the administrator finds, after noticed hearing, that the owner or operator has violated this chapter and that previous convictions, judgments, or settlements for those violations occurred during the prior three years and meet all of the following criteria: 

(1) The violations have not been corrected or reasonable progress toward correction has not been achieved. 

(2) The violations demonstrate a recurring pattern of noncompliance. 

(3) The violations pose, or have posed, a significant risk to public health and safety or to the environment. 

(b) The administrator shall not order the termination of operations pursuant to subdivision (a) if the decision to deny is based, in whole or in part, on violations that were resolved through a settlement, unless the administrator presents substantial evidence proving that the violations did occur and the applicant is then given the opportunity to rebut the evidence of the administrator. 

(c) The administrator may allow terminals to resume transfers to and from the tankers or barges described if, after noticed hearing, the administrator is satisfied that the owner or operator has corrected all violations and will comply with all of the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

8755.

(a) The administrator and the executive officer of the commission shall confer and propose, and the commission shall adopt, rules, regulations, guidelines, and commission leasing policies for reviewing the location, type, character, performance standards, size, and operation of all existing and proposed marine terminals within the state, whether or not on lands leased from the commission, and all other marine facilities on lands under lease from the commission to minimize the possibilities of a discharge of oil. Rules, regulations, and guidelines adopted by the commission shall not conflict with regulations of the administrator or the Coast Guard. The commission shall ensure that the rules, regulations, guidelines, and commission lease covenants provide the best
 achievable protection of public health and safety and the environment. Any rules, regulations, and guidelines governing the location of a marine terminal on lands under lease from a local government or port district shall not include provisions for review by the commission of any specific location, provided the location chosen or approved by the local government meets standards specified in the rules, regulations, and guidelines.

(b) This section shall not apply to any aboveground oil storage tank located entirely onshore which is subject to inspection programs and regulation under Chapter 6.67 (commencing with Section 25270) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code. This section shall include pipelines that are within or part of marine terminals. This section shall not apply to pipelines that are used exclusively to transport petroleum products and are subject to the jurisdiction of the State Fire Marshal under either state or federal
 law.

(c) The commission shall consult with the administrator and other affected local and federal agencies with respect to the rules, regulations, and guidelines. The consultation with the administrator shall ensure, at a minimum, consistency with the requirements for vessels that the administrator adopts under Section 8670.17 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2012.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 70) and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 71.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.   Section operative January 1, 2012, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8756.

The commission shall periodically review and accordingly modify its rules, regulations, guidelines, and commission leasing policies to ensure that all operators of marine terminals within the state and marine facilities under the commission’s jurisdiction always provide the best achievable protection of the public health and safety, and the environment. This section shall not apply to pipelines that are used exclusively to transport petroleum products and are subject to the jurisdiction of the State Fire Marshal under either state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1248, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

8757.

(a) The commission shall inspect or cause to be inspected, on a regular basis, all marine facilities, along with associated equipment and shall monitor their operations and the effects on public health, safety, and the environment. These inspection and monitoring activities shall, to the greatest extent possible, be coordinated with federal, state, and local agencies having lawful jurisdiction. The commission shall maintain a record of these activities for each marine facility.

(b) Any such inspection conducted under this chapter shall be coordinated to the maximum extent with other state, federal, and local agencies. The commission is specifically encouraged to enter into agreements that would permit other agencies with existing inspection programs, including, but not limited to, the Division of Oil and Gas, the California Coastal Commission, and the State Water Resources Control Board, to conduct the inspections required in this chapter. This section does not apply to pipelines that are used exclusively to transport petroleum products and are subject to the jurisdiction of the State Fire Marshal under either state or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1314, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8758.

(a) Each operator of a marine facility shall prepare an operations manual describing equipment and procedures which the operator employs or will employ to protect public health and safety, and the environment and to prevent oil spills. The operations manual shall also describe equipment and procedures required for all vessels to or from which oil is transferred through use of the marine facility. The operations manual shall be submitted for approval to the commission.

(b) Every existing operator shall submit a manual within one year after the commission has adopted a program of rules, regulations, and guidelines as specified in this section.

(c) The commission shall approve the operations manual if the manual meets the governing rules, regulations, and guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (b). The commission shall deny approval of the operations manual if the commission finds the operations manual is not consistent with the rules, regulations, and guidelines. If the commission denies approval, it shall provide written reasons for its decision. The operator shall, within 90 days, submit a new manual responding to the reason for refusal and incorporating any suggested modifications. 

(d) The operations manual shall be updated as necessary pursuant to the findings in the hazards and operability study or as when facility operations or technology change.

(e) The commission may require modification of the operations manual of any operator within its jurisdiction if the commission finds that the manual is no longer consistent with the rules, regulations, and guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) Once an operator’s operations manual has been approved, all equipment and operations of the operator’s marine facility shall be maintained or be carried out in accordance with the operations manual.

(g) All vessels docked at any marine facility in the state shall comply with the terms of the operations manual of the marine facility.

(h) The commission shall report to the administrator each marine facility whose operations manual is denied after the second submission. Failure to gain approval after the second submission may be determined by the administrator to be a violation of Chapter 7.4 (commencing with Section 8670.1) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The administrator shall take any action he or she determines to be necessary.

(i) This section does not apply to pipelines that are used exclusively to transport petroleum products and are subject to the jurisdiction of the State Fire Marshal under either state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1248, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

8759.

The commission shall be reimbursed from the Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund for reasonable expenses undertaken under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1248, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

8760.

The commission shall consult with the administrator, other state agencies, and agencies of the federal government, such as the United States Coast Guard and the Department of Transportation, to the maximum extent feasible, before undertaking actions pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1248, Sec. 19.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. SURVEYING AND MAPPING [8801. - 8902.]



CHAPTER 1. California Coordinate System [8801. - 8819.]

8801.

(a) The system of plane coordinates that has been established by the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey for defining and stating the positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the State of California is based on the North American Datum of 1927 and is identified as the “California Coordinate System.” After January 1, 1987, this system shall be known as the “California Coordinate System of 1927.”

(b) The system of plane coordinates which has been established by the National Geodetic Survey for defining and stating the positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the State of California and which is based on the North American Datum of 1983 shall be known as the
 “California Coordinate System of 1983.”

(c) As used in this chapter:

(1) “NAD27” means the North American Datum of 1927.

(2) “CCS27” means the California Coordinate System of 1927.

(3) “NAD83” means the North American Datum of 1983.

(4) “CCS83” means the California Coordinate System of 1983.

(5) “USC&GS” means the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey.

(6) “NGS” means the National Geodetic Survey or its successor.

(7) “FGCS” means the Federal Geodetic Control Subcommittee or its
 successor.

(8) “NATRF2022” means the North American Terrestrial Reference Frame of 2022.

(9) “PATRF2022” means the Pacific Terrestrial Reference Frame of 2022.

(10) “CCS2022” means the California Coordinate System of 2022.

(11) “CSRC” means the California Spatial Reference Center or its successor.

(12) “CSRN” means the California Spatial Reference Network, as defined by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 8850), “Geodetic Datums and the California Spatial Reference Network.”

(13) “GPS” means Global Positioning System and includes other, similar space-based systems.

(14) “FGDC” means the Federal Geographic Data Committee or its successor.

(15) “NSRS” means the National Spatial Reference System.

(d) The California portion of the system of plane coordinates defined as the State Plane Coordinates System of 2022 (SPCS2022) as established by NGS and maintained by either NGS or CSRC shall be known as the “California Coordinate System of 2022.”

(e) The use of the term “State Plane Coordinates”
 refers only to CCS27, CCS83, and CCS2022 coordinates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 1.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

For CCS27, the state is divided into seven zones. For CCS83, the state is divided into six zones. Zone 7 of CCS27, which encompasses Los Angeles County, is eliminated and the area is included in Zone 5 of CCS83.

Each zone of CCS27 is a Lambert conformal conic projection based on Clarke’s Spheroid of 1866, which is the basis of NAD27. The points of control of zones one to six, inclusive, bear the coordinates: Northing (y) = 000.00 feet and Easting (x) = 2,000,000 feet. The point of control of Zone 7 bears the coordinates: Northing (y) = 4,160,926.74 feet and Easting (x) = 4,186,692.58 feet.

Each zone of CCS83 is a Lambert conformal conic projection based on the Geodetic Reference System of 1980, which is the basis of NAD83. The point of control of each of the six zones bear the coordinates: Northing (y) = 500,000 meters and Easting (x) = 2,000,000 meters.

The area included in the following counties constitutes Zone 1 of CCS27 and CCS83: Del Norte, Humboldt, Lassen, Modoc, Plumas, Shasta, Siskiyou, Tehama, and Trinity.

The area included in the following counties constitutes Zone 2 of CCS27 and CCS83: Alpine, Amador, Butte, Colusa, El Dorado, Glenn, Lake, Mendocino, Napa, Nevada, Placer, Sacramento, Sierra, Solano, Sonoma, Sutter, Yolo, and Yuba.

The area included in the following counties constitutes Zone 3 of CCS27 and CCS83: Alameda, Calaveras, Contra Costa, Madera, Marin, Mariposa, Merced, Mono, San Francisco, San Joaquin, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Stanislaus, and Tuolumne.

The area included in the following counties constitutes Zone 4 of CCS27 and CCS83: Fresno, Inyo, Kings, Monterey, San Benito, and Tulare.

The area included in the following counties and Channel Islands constitutes Zone 5 of CCS27: Kern, San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara (excepting Santa Barbara Island), and Ventura (excepting San Nicholas Island) and the Channel Islands of Santa Cruz, Santa Rosa, San Miguel, and Anacapa.

The area included in the following counties and Channel Islands constitutes Zone 5 of CCS83: Kern, Los Angeles (excepting San Clemente and Santa Catalina Islands), San Bernardino, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara (excepting Santa Barbara Island), and Ventura (excepting San Nicholas Island) and the Channel Islands of Santa Cruz, Santa Rosa, San Miguel, and Anacapa.

The area included in the following counties and Channel Islands constitutes Zone 6 of CCS27 and CCS83: Imperial, Orange, Riverside, and San Diego and the Channel Islands of San Clemente, Santa Catalina, Santa Barbara, and San Nicholas.

The area included in Los Angeles County constitutes Zone 7 of CCS27.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

Zone 1 coordinates shall be named, and, on any map on which they are used, they shall be designated as “CCS27, Zone 1 or CCS83, Zone 1.”

On their respective spheroids of reference: (1) the standard parallels of CCS27, Zone 1 and CCS83, Zone 1 are at north latitudes 40 degrees 00 minutes and 41 degrees 40 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact; and (2) the point of control of coordinates is at the intersection of the zone’s central meridian, which is at 122 degrees 00 minutes west longitude, with the parallel 39 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

Zone 2 coordinates shall be named, and, on any map on which they are used, they shall be designated as “CCS27, Zone 2 or CCS83, Zone 2.”

On their respective spheroids of reference: (1) the standard parallels of CCS27, Zone 2 and CCS83, Zone 2 are at north latitudes 38 degrees 20 minutes and 39 degrees 50 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact; and (2) the point of control of coordinates is at the intersection of the zone’s central meridian, which is at 122 degrees 00 minutes west longitude, with the parallel 37 degrees 40 minutes north latitude.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

Zone 3 coordinates shall be named, and, on any map on which they are used, they shall be designated as “CCS27, Zone 3 or CCS83, Zone 3.”

On their respective spheroids of reference: (1) the standard parallels of CCS27, Zone 3 and CCS83, Zone 3 are at north latitudes 37 degrees 04 minutes and 38 degrees 26 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact; and (2) the point of control of coordinates is at the intersection of the zone’s central meridian, which is at 120 degrees 30 minutes west longitude, with the parallel 36 degrees 30 minutes north latitude.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8806.

Zone 4 coordinates shall be named, and, on any map on which they are used, they shall be designated as “CCS27, Zone 4 or CCS83, Zone 4.”

On their respective spheroids of reference: (1) the standard parallels of CCS27, Zone 4 and CCS83, Zone 4 are at north latitudes 36 degrees 00 minutes and 37 degrees 15 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact; and (2) the point of control of coordinates is at the intersection of the zone’s central meridian, which is at 119 degrees 00 minutes west longitude, with the parallel 35 degrees 20 minutes north latitude.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

8807.

Zone 5 coordinates shall be named, and, on any map on which they are used, they shall be designated as “CCS27, Zone 5 or CCS83, Zone 5.”

On their respective spheroids of reference: (1) the standard parallels of CCS27, Zone 5 and CCS83, Zone 5 are at north latitudes 34 degrees 02 minutes and 35 degrees 28 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact; and (2) the point of control of coordinates is at the intersection of the zone’s central meridian, which is at 118 degrees 00 minutes west longitude, with the parallel 33 degrees 30 minutes north latitude.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8808.

Zone 6 coordinates shall be named, and, on any map on which they are used, they shall be designated as “CCS27, Zone 6 or CCS83, Zone 6.”

On their respective spheroids of reference: (1) the standard parallels of CCS27, Zone 6 and CCS83, Zone 6 are at north latitudes 32 degrees 47 minutes and 33 degrees 53 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact; and (2) the point of control of coordinates is at the intersection of the zone’s central meridian, which is at 116 degrees 15 minutes west longitude, with the parallel 32 degrees 10 minutes north latitude.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 611, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8809.

Zone 7 coordinates shall be named, and, on any map on which they are used, they shall be designated as “CCS27, Zone 7.”

On its respective spheroid of reference: (1) the standard parallels of CCS27, Zone 7 are at north latitudes 33 degrees 52 minutes and 34 degrees 25 minutes, along which parallels the scale shall be exact; and (2) the point of control of coordinates is at the intersection of the zone’s central meridian, which is at 118 degrees 20 minutes west longitude, with the parallel 34 degrees 08 minutes north latitude.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8810.

The plane coordinates of a point on the earth’s surface, to be used in expressing the position or location of the point in the appropriate zone of CCS27 or CCS83, shall consist of two distances, expressed in feet and decimals of a foot or meters and decimals of a meter. One of these distances, to be known as the “East x-coordinate,” shall give the distance east of the Y axis; the other, to be known as the “North y-coordinate,” shall give the distance north of the X axis. The Y axis of any zone shall be parallel with the central meridian of that zone. The X axis of any zone shall
 be at right angles to the central meridian of that zone. When the values are expressed in feet, the “U.S. Survey foot,” (one foot equals 1200/3937 meters) shall be used as the standard foot for CCS27 and CCS83. For CCS2022, the official conversion, commonly called the international foot, shall be used (one foot equals 0.3048 meters).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 111, Sec. 2.   (SB 566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8811.

If the survey of any parcel of land extends from one coordinate zone into another, the positions of all points delineated upon the map thereof may be referred to either of these zones. The zone which is used shall be specifically named in the title upon the map.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8812 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 454, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8812.

Prior to January 1, 2000, state plane coordinates shall be based on, or derived from, the plane coordinates of monumented second order or better horizontal control stations that have been published by the USC&GS or NGS. Any survey or map that uses those coordinates shall be based on, and show, established field-observed direct connections to at least two stations of corresponding or better accuracy whose credentials are based upon published stations of the USC&GS or NGS. The geodetic positions of CCS27 and CCS83 stations that are used to increase the density of control and that purport to be of second order or better accuracy shall have been surveyed in conformity with the applicable survey standards and specifications in effect at the time of the survey as defined by the FGCS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 454, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8813.

After December 31, 1999, and prior to January 1, 2006, any survey or map that uses state plane coordinates shall be based on, and show, field-observed direct connections to at least two horizontal reference stations that are one of the following:

(a) Included in the CSRN.

(b) Located outside the State of California and meet all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN, except for the requirement that they be inside California.

(c) Shown on a subdivision map, record of survey, or a map filed with the county surveyor by a public officer and whose horizontal positions have been determined by Global Positioning System survey methods in accordance with first order or better FGCS standards and specifications and whose state plane coordinates are based on field-observed direct, nontrivial connections to at least two stations that are included in subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8813.1.

On and after December 31, 2005, a survey that uses or establishes a CCS83 value or values shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) (1) The survey shall be referenced to and shall have field-observed statistically independent connections to one or more horizontal reference stations, except as provided in paragraph (2), that is or are one of the following:

(A) CSRN station.

(B) Geodetic control station located outside of the State of California that meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN except that the station is outside California.

(C) Existing CCS83 station that is all of the following:

(i) Is shown on a map filed with the applicable county surveyor by a public officer, subdivision map, corner record, or record of survey.

(ii) Meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN, except that the station and its data are not published by NGS or CSRC.

(iii) Has an accuracy, conforming to the applicable CSRN requirements, stated for the station’s value.

(D) Existing CCS83 station that is all of the following:

(i) Is shown on a public map or document that is compiled and maintained by the applicable county surveyor.

(ii) Meets all the requirements for inclusion in the CSRN, except that the station and its data are not published by NGS or CSRC.

(iii) Has an accuracy, conforming to the applicable CSRN requirements, stated for the station’s value.

(2) On and after January 1, 2023, for purposes of a survey that establishes a CCS83 value or values, the survey shall be referenced to and shall have field-observed statistically independent connections to two or more horizontal reference stations.

(b) If an accuracy is to be claimed for the CCS83 value or values established, the claimed accuracy shall be an accuracy standard published by FGDC or FGCS.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 302, Sec. 11.   (SB 1120)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8813.2.

After December 31, 2005, if an accuracy is claimed for a CCS83 value or values, the survey that established the value or values shall be documented on a map, record of survey, corner record, or other document that includes, in addition to other requirements in this chapter, the following:

(a) For each CCS83 station, the resultant CCS83 value or values.

(b) The FGDC or FGCS accuracy standard of the CCS83 value or values established. FGDC accuracies shall be identified as either a local or network accuracy.

(c) Additional written data that justifies the FGDC or FGCS accuracy standard shown. Such additional written data shall include observation equipment, control diagram including required field-observed statistically independent connection or connections, adjustment methodology and software used, a summary of the procedures used or a reference to published commonly accepted procedural specifications, final residuals or closures, and other data essential for others to evaluate the survey.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8813.3.

(a) After December 31, 2005, when a survey that uses or establishes a CCS83 value or values is shown on any document, the station or stations to which the CCS83 value or values are referenced and connected and the CCS83 value or values and the published or stated accuracy or accuracies of that reference station or stations shall be shown also on the document.

(b) If a CCS83 survey begins before January 1, 2006, and is not completed by that date, the CCS83 survey may be completed in accordance with Sections 8813 and 8815.4 of this chapter or Sections 8813.1, 8813.2, and 8813.3 of this chapter, at the surveyor’s option. All other applicable provisions of this chapter remain applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

8814.
